Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1982 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and to make other minor word changes. Additional minor word changes were also made throughout the title in 1987, 1991, 1998, 2010, and 2018.

Cross references. —

For temporary provisions relating to occupational licensing and the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 6 and 8, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary provision relating to immunity for certain licenses for actions related to exposure to COVID-19, see sec. 14, ch. 2, SLA 2021. in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For professional and vocational regulations, see 12 AAC.

Collateral references. —

51 Am. Jur. 2d, Licenses and Permits, §§ 1 — 151.

53 C.J.S., Licenses, § et seq.